Louisiana, session 2026, HB154.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:315.1(C)(8) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
9:315.1(C)(9) and 405.1 through 405.3 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§315.1. Rebuttable presumption; deviation from guidelines by court; stipulations by
parties
* * *
C. In determining whether to deviate from the guidelines, the court's
considerations may include:
* * *
(8) The status of a parent as an unemancipated minor with limited
contractual, procedural, and earning capacity; the availability of familial or other
sources of support to the minor parent; and the desirability of continuing the minor
parent's education.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 154 ENROLLED
(9) Any other consideration which that would make application of the
guidelines not in the best interest of the child or children or inequitable to the parties.
* * *
§405.1. Minors; acknowledgment of paternity
An unemancipated minor who is under sixteen years of age may not enter
into an acknowledgment of paternity. An unemancipated minor who is sixteen or
seventeen years of age may not enter into an acknowledgment of paternity without
judicial authorization.
Revision Comments - 2026
(a) The rights of emancipated minors are governed by Chapter 2 of Title VIII
of Book I of the Civil Code and depend upon the type of emancipation.
(b) Unemancipated minors lack the procedural capacity to sue and be sued.
Accordingly, the provisions of Civil Code Article 222 and Code of Civil Procedure
Article 683 apply in this context and provide for representation by an unemancipated
minor's married parents or tutor in a proceeding to acquire judicial authorization.
(c) This provision mirrors Civil Code Articles 90.1 and 2333, which provide
that minors under sixteen years of age are not permitted to marry or enter into
matrimonial agreements and that sixteen- and seventeen-year-old minors may enter
into those contracts under limited circumstances.
§405.2. Minors; judicial authorization of acknowledgment of paternity; venue
A request for judicial authorization pursuant to R.S. 9:405.1 may be
submitted to a court of competent jurisdiction in the parish in which the minor parent
executing the acknowledgment is domiciled or in the parish in which the child to be
acknowledged is domiciled.
§405.3. Minors; application for judicial authorization of acknowledgment of
paternity; procedure
A. Upon request by an unemancipated minor who is sixteen or seventeen
years of age, the court may authorize the acknowledgment of paternity ex parte after
considering the best interest of the minor parent executing the acknowledgment and
the best interest of the child to be acknowledged.
B. The court may, in its discretion, require that the minor parent executing
the acknowledgment be present to evaluate whether the minor parent understands the
nature and consequences of an acknowledgment of paternity, whether the minor
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 154 ENROLLED
parent understands his right to seek blood and tissue tests for determination of
paternity before executing the acknowledgment, and whether the minor parent has
discussed the acknowledgment with his parents or tutor.
Revision Comments - 2026
If the court denies the request, the minor parent may file a petition for judicial
emancipation. See Civil Code Article 366.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.